__backup__lexica__/part.lexc
!!!part.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +Part

LEXICON Root
Part;

LEXICON PartInf
+Part:0 #;

LEXICON Part
!Lexical items from corpus
یا	PartInf;
خوب	PartInf;
که	PartInf;
دیگر	PartInf;
آیا	PartInf;
آخر	PartInf;
مگر	PartInf;
را	PartInf;
